North Dakota, session 69, SB2073.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subdivision xx of subsection 2 of section 12-60-24 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
xx. The office of state treasurer for each individualan applicant or employee who has access
to federal tax information under chapter 54 - 11 - 16 .
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 54-11-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-11-16. Criminal history record checks.
The state treasurer shall require any applicant, or employee, or independent contractor who has
access to federal tax information to submit to a statewide and nationwide criminal history record check,
and subsequent recheck within tenfive years from the date of the previous criminal history record
check. The nationwide criminal history record check must be conducted in the manner provided by
section 12-60-24.

S. B. NO. 2073 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2073.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State